Virginia statutes. Title 60.2. Unemployment Compensation.
Chapter 2. Definitions.

§ 60.2-200.
Definitions generally.

As used in this title, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the terms defined in this chapter shall have the meanings there ascribed to them.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-2; 1964, c. 3; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-2; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-201.
Agricultural labor.

The term “agricultural labor” includes all service performed:

On a farm, in the employ of any person, in connection with cultivating the soil, or in connection with raising or harvesting any agricultural or horticultural commodity, including the raising, shearing, feeding, caring for, training, and management of livestock, bees, poultry, and fur-bearing animals and wildlife.

In the employ of the owner or tenant or other operator of a farm, in connection with the operation, management, conservation, improvement, or maintenance of such farm and its tools and equipment, or in salvaging timber or clearing land of brush and other debris left by a hurricane, if the major part of such service is performed on a farm.

In connection with the production or harvesting of any commodity defined as an agricultural commodity in 12 U.S.C. § 1141j of the Federal Agricultural Marketing Act, or in connection with the ginning of cotton, or in connection with the operation or maintenance of ditches, canals, reservoirs, or waterways not owned or operated for profit used exclusively for supplying and storing water for farming purposes.

In the employ of the operator of a farm in handling, planting, drying, packing, packaging, processing, freezing, grading, storing, or delivering to storage or to market or to a carrier for transportation to market, in its unmanufactured state, any such agricultural or horticultural commodity; but only if such operator produced more than one-half of the commodity with respect to which such service is performed;

In the employ of a group of operators of farms (or a cooperative organization of which such operators are members) in the performance of service described in subdivision 4 a of this subsection, but only if such operators produced more than one-half of the commodity with respect to which such service is performed;

The provisions of subdivisions 4 a and 4 b of this section shall not be deemed to be applicable with respect to service performed in connection with commercial canning or commercial freezing or in connection with any agricultural or horticultural commodity after its delivery to a terminal market for distribution for consumption.

As used in this section, the term “farm” includes stock, dairy, poultry, fruit, fur-bearing animal and truck farms, plantations, ranches, nurseries, ranges, greenhouses or other similar structures used primarily for the raising of agricultural or horticultural commodities and orchards.

5.

On a farm operated for profit if such service is not in the course of the employer’s trade or business or is domestic service in a private home of the employer.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-3; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-3; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1972, c. 764; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-202.
Annual payroll.

“Annual payroll”
means the total amount of wages payable by an employer, regardless of the time of payment, for employment during a calendar year.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-4; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-4; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-203.
Average annual payroll.

“Average annual payroll”
means the average of the annual payrolls of any employer for the last three or five preceding calendar years, whichever is higher.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-5; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-5; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-204.
Base period.

“Base period”
means the first four of the last five completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of the claimant’s benefit year; however, if the claimant has earned insufficient wages in the first four of the last five completed calendar quarters to become eligible for benefits, then such claimant’s “base period” shall be the four most recent completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of the claimant’s benefit year.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-6.1; 1956, c. 440; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-6; 1974, c. 466; 1986, c. 480; 2003, c. 383.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 383 substituted “claimant’s” for “individual’s,” and added the language beginning “however, if the claimant” at the end of the section.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Unemployment Compensation, § 9.

§ 60.2-205.
Benefits.

“Benefits”
means the money payments payable to an individual, as provided in this title, with respect to his unemployment.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-7; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-7; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-206.
Benefit year.

“Benefit year”
with respect to any individual means a period of fifty-two consecutive weeks beginning with the first day of the week in which an individual files a new valid claim for benefits except that the benefit year shall be fifty-three weeks if filing of a new valid claim would result in overlapping any quarter of the base period of a previously filed new claim. An initial claim for benefits filed in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Commission under the provisions of this title shall be deemed to be a valid claim within the purposes of this definition if the individual has been paid wages in his base period sufficient to make him eligible for benefits under the provisions of Chapter 6 (§

60.2-600

et seq.) of this title.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-8.1; 1956, c. 440; 1964, c. 3; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-8; 1974, c. 466; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-207.
Calendar quarter.

“Calendar quarter”
means the period of three consecutive calendar months ending on March 31, June 30, September 30 or December 31, or the equivalent thereof, as the Commission may by regulation prescribe.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-9; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-9; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-208.
Commission.

“Commission”
means the Virginia Employment Commission. Wherever in this Code, or any act of the General Assembly the term

“Unemployment Compensation Commission”

is used, it shall mean the Virginia Employment Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-10; 1960, c. 136; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-10; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-209.
Taxes.

“Taxes”
means the money imposed by and collectible under this title and includes payments in lieu of taxes collectible under §§

60.2-501

through

60.2-507

.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-11; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-11; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-210.
Employer.

The term “employer” means any employing unit which:

In any calendar quarter in either the current or preceding calendar year paid for some service in employment wages of $1,500 or more or such other amount as provided by federal law pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 3306; or

For some portion of a day in each of twenty different weeks, whether or not such weeks were consecutive, in either the current or the preceding calendar year, has or had in its employment at least one individual, irrespective of whether the same individual was in employment in each such day.

The term “employer” shall also mean:

Any employing unit which acquired the organization, trade, separate establishment or business or substantially all the assets thereof, of another which at the time of such acquisition was an employer subject to this title;

Any employing unit which acquired the organization, trade or business or substantially all the assets thereof, of another employing unit and which, if treated as a single unit with such other employing unit, would be an employer under subsection A of this section;

Any employing unit which together with one or more other employing units, is owned or controlled, by legally enforceable means or otherwise, directly or indirectly by the same interests, or which owns or controls one or more other employing units, by legally enforceable means or otherwise, and which if treated as a single unit with such other employing unit, would be an employer under subsection A or B of this section;

Any employing unit which having become an employer under subsection A of this section or subdivisions 1, 2, 3, 6, 7 or 8 of this subsection has not, under §

60.2-509

, ceased to be an employer subject to this title;

For the effective period of its election pursuant to §

60.2-510

, any other employing unit which has elected to become fully subject to this title;

Any employing unit not an employer by reason of any other subdivision of this section (i) for which, within either the current or preceding calendar year, service is or was performed with respect to which such employing unit is liable for any federal tax against which credit may be taken for taxes required to be paid into a state unemployment fund; or (ii) which, as a condition for approval of this title for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, is required, pursuant to such act, to be an “employer” under this title;

Any employing unit for which service in employment, as defined in subdivisions 1 through 3 of subsection A of §

60.2-213

, is performed;

Any employing unit, for which service in employment, as defined in subdivision 4 of subsection A of §

60.2-213

, is performed;

For the purposes of subdivision 2 of subsection A of this section and subdivisions 8 and 10 of this subsection if any week includes both December 31 and January 1, the days of that week up to January 1 shall be deemed one calendar week and the days beginning January 1 another such week;

Any employing unit for which agricultural labor in employment as defined in §

60.2-214

is performed; or

Any employing unit for which domestic service in employment as defined in §

60.2-215

is performed.

In determining whether an employing unit for which service other than domestic service is also performed is an employer under subsection A or subdivision 10 of subsection B of this section, the wages earned or the employment of an employee performing domestic service shall not be taken into account.
C. 1. In determining whether an employing unit for which service other than domestic service is also performed is an employer under subsection A or subdivision 10 of subsection B of this section, the wages earned or the employment of an employee performing domestic service shall not be taken into account.

In determining whether an employing unit for which service other than agricultural labor is also performed is an employer under subsection A or subdivision 11 of subsection B of this section, the wages earned or the employment of an employee performing service in agricultural labor shall not be taken into account. If an employing unit is determined an employer of agricultural labor, such employing unit shall be determined an employer for the purpose of subsection A of this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-12; 1956, c. 440; 1964, c. 3; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-12; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1974, c. 466; 1977, c. 330; 1979, c. 637; 1986, c. 480.

Cross references.

As to worker misclassification, see §

58.1-1900

et seq.

§ 60.2-211.
Employing unit.

“Employing unit” means any of the following which has or had in its employ one or more individuals performing services for it within this Commonwealth:

Any individual or type of organization, including the state government and its instrumentalities;

Any of the political subdivisions of this Commonwealth and their instrumentalities;

Any instrumentalities wholly owned (i) by this Commonwealth and one or more political subdivisions, (ii) by a combination of political subdivisions or (iii) by any of the foregoing and one or more other states or their political subdivisions;

Any partnership, association, trust, estate, joint-stock company, insurance company or corporation, whether domestic or foreign, or the receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, trustee or successor thereof; or

The legal representative of a deceased person.

All individuals performing services within this Commonwealth for any employing unit which maintains two or more separate establishments within this Commonwealth shall be deemed to be employed by a single employing unit for all the purposes of this title. Whenever any employing unit contracts with any person for any service which is a part of such employing unit’s usual trade, occupation, profession or business, that employing unit shall be deemed to employ all individuals employed by such person for such service unless such person performs service or is in fact actually available to perform service for anyone who may wish to contract with him and is also found to be engaged in an independently established trade, occupation, profession or business. Each individual employed to perform or to assist in performing the work of any agent or employee of an employing unit shall be deemed to be employed by such employing unit for all the purposes of this title, whether such individual was hired or paid directly by such employing unit or by such agent or employee, provided the employing unit had actual or constructive knowledge of such work.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-13; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-13; 1974, cc. 466, 660; 1977, c. 330; 1986, c. 480.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Unemployment Compensation, § 3.

§ 60.2-212.
Employment.

“Employment” means:

Any service including service in interstate commerce, performed for remuneration or under any contract of hire, written or oral, express or implied; and

Any service, of whatever nature, performed by an individual for any employing unit, for remuneration or under any contract of hire, written or oral, and irrespective of citizenship or residence of either,

Within the United States, or

On or in connection with an American vessel or American aircraft under a contract of service which is entered into within the United States or during the performance of which and while the individual is employed on the vessel or aircraft it touches at a port in the United States, if such individual performs such services on or in connection with such vessel or aircraft when outside the United States, provided that the operating office, from which the operations of the vessel or aircraft are ordinarily and regularly supervised, managed, directed or controlled, is within the Commonwealth.

Notwithstanding subdivision 2 b of subsection A of this section, “employment” means all service performed by an officer or member of the crew of an American vessel on or in connection with such vessel, if the operating office from which the operations of such vessel operating on navigable waters within, or within and without, the United States are ordinarily and regularly supervised, managed, directed and controlled is within the Commonwealth.

Services performed by an individual for remuneration shall be deemed to be employment subject to this title unless the Commission determines that such individual is not an employee for purposes of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act and the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, based upon an application of the standard used by the Internal Revenue Service for such determinations.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection C, an individual who performs services as a real estate salesperson, under direction of a real estate broker under Chapter 21 (§

54.1-2100

et seq.) of Title 54.1, or as a real estate appraiser under Chapter 20.1 (§

54.1-2009

et seq.) of Title 54.1 pursuant to an executed independent contractor agreement and for remuneration solely by way of commission or fee, shall not be an employee for purposes of this chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection C, a hiring party providing an individual with personal protective equipment in response to a disaster caused by a communicable disease of public health threat for which a state of emergency has been declared pursuant to §

44-146.17

shall not be considered in any determination regarding whether such individual is an employee or independent contractor. For the purposes of this subsection, the terms “communicable disease of public health threat,” “disaster,” and “state of emergency” have the same meaning as provided in § 44-146.16.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-14; 1952, cc. 30, 184; 1956, c. 440; 1962, c. 71; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-14; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1972, c. 824; 1974, cc. 466, 660; 1976, c. 304; 1977, c. 330; 1979, c. 637; 1980, cc. 520, 522; 1981, cc. 28, 369, 374, 375; 1982, c. 25; 1983, c. 14; 1984, cc. 120, 139, 204; 1985, cc. 152, 254; 1986, c. 480; 1996, c. 244; 2005, c. 892; 2020, c. 1261; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 448.

Cross references.

As to reports by employers to the Virginia New Hire Reporting Center, operated under the authority of the Division of Child Support Enforcement, of the employment of persons defined in §

60.2-212

, see §

63.2-1946

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1261, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of § 30-19.03:1.2 of the Code of Virginia shall not apply to this act.”

Acts 2020, c. 1261, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on January 1, 2021, if the Virginia Employment Commission has not, on or before such date, received adequate funding from the U.S. Department of Labor that covers the costs of information technology upgrades, training, publicity, and marketing that are incurred by the Virginia Employment Commission in connection with establishing the short-time compensation program pursuant to the first enactment of this act.” Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 8, cl. 2, effective October 21, 2020,
repealed clauses 3 and 4 of Acts 2020, c. 1261. The amendments by Acts 2020, c. 1261 will not expire.

Acts 2020, c. 1261, cl. 4 provides: “That, if not sooner expired pursuant to the provisions of the third enactment of this act, this act shall expire on July 1, 2022.” Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 8, cl. 2, effective October 21, 2020, repealed clauses 3 and 4 of Acts 2020, c. 1261. The amendments by Acts 2020, c. 1261 will not expire.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 892 rewrote subsection C.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1261, substituted “standard used by the Internal Revenue Service for such determinations” for “20 factors set forth in Internal Revenue Service Revenue Ruling 87-41, issued pursuant to 26 C.F.R. 31.3306(i)-1 and 26 C.F.R. 31.3121(d)-1” in subsection C at the end.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 448, effective July 1, 2021, added subsection E.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on governmental services and social welfare for the year 1976-77, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1440 (1977).

For annual survey of Virginia labor and employment law, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2005).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Unemployment Compensation, §§ 3, 5.

§ 60.2-212.1.
Employment; special exclusion.

In the trucking industry, an owner-operator or lessee of a vehicle which is licensed and registered as a truck, tractor, or truck-tractor by a governmental motor vehicle regulatory agency is an independent contractor, not an employee, while performing services in the operation of his truck, if each of the following factors is substantially present:

The individual owns the equipment or holds it under a bona fide lease arrangement;

The individual is responsible for the maintenance of the equipment;

The individual bears the principal burdens of the operating costs, including fuel, repairs, supplies, vehicle insurance, and personal expenses while on the road;

The individual is responsible for supplying the necessary personal services to operate the equipment;

The individual’s compensation is based on factors related to the work performed including a percentage of any schedule of rates or lawfully published tariff and not on the basis of the hours or time expended;

The individual generally determines the details and means of performing the services, in conformance with regulatory requirements, operating procedures of the carrier and specifications of the shipper; and

The individual enters into a contract that specifies the relationship to be that of an independent contractor and not that of an employee.

No such owner-operator or lessee who qualifies under the criteria set forth in subsection A of this section shall be considered by the Commission to be an employee covered by this title for any services performed prior to or after January 1, 1987. Taxes paid or benefits collected prior to January 1, 1987, that would be affected by the provisions of this section, shall not be subject to refund.

History.

1987, c. 539.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Unemployment Compensation, § 5.

§ 60.2-212.2.
Obtaining a determination or opinion.

If an employing unit is unsure of the status of an individual performing services for it, the employing unit may obtain a written determination pursuant to §

60.2-500

.

History.

1987, c. 539.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Unemployment Compensation, § 5.

§ 60.2-213.
Employment with hospital, higher education, state, subdivision, or certain religious or charitable organizations.

“Employment” includes:

Service performed by an individual (i) in the employ of the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions or instrumentalities or (ii) in the employ of the Commonwealth and one or more other states or their political subdivisions or instrumentalities, for a hospital or institution of higher education located in this Commonwealth provided that such service is excluded from “employment” as defined in the Federal Unemployment Tax Act solely by reason of § 3306(c)(7) of that act and is not excluded from “employment” under subsection B;

Service performed by an individual (i) in the employ of the Commonwealth or any of its wholly owned instrumentalities or (ii) in the employ of the Commonwealth and one or more other states or their instrumentalities, provided that such service is excluded from “employment” as defined in the Federal Unemployment Tax Act (26 U.S.C.) by § 3306(c)(7) of that act and is not excluded from “employment” under subsection B;

Service performed by an individual (i) in the employ of any political subdivision of the Commonwealth or any of its wholly owned instrumentalities or (ii) in the employ of any instrumentality wholly owned by this Commonwealth, any of its political subdivisions or instrumentalities, or any instrumentality wholly owned by any of the foregoing and one or more other states or their political subdivisions, provided that such service is excluded from “employment” as defined in the Federal Unemployment Tax Act by § 3306(c)(7) of that act and is not excluded from “employment” under subsection B;

Service performed by an individual in the employ of a religious, charitable, educational or other organization but only if the following conditions are met:

Their service is excluded from “employment” as defined in the Federal Unemployment Tax Act (26 U.S.C.) solely by reason of § 3306(c)(8) of that act; and

The organization had four or more individuals in employment for some portion of a day in each of 20 different weeks, whether or not such weeks were consecutive, within either the current or preceding calendar year, regardless of whether they were employed at the same moment of time.

For the purposes of subdivisions A 3 and 4, the term “employment” does not apply to service performed:

In the employ of (i) a church or convention or association of churches, or (ii) an organization which is operated primarily for religious purposes and which is operated, supervised, controlled, or principally supported by a church or convention or association of churches;

By a duly ordained, commissioned, or licensed minister of a church in the exercise of his ministry or by a member of a religious order in the exercise of duties required by such order;

In a facility conducted for the purpose of carrying out a program of rehabilitation for individuals whose earning capacity is impaired by age, physical deficiency, mental illness, intellectual disability, or injury or providing remunerative work for individuals who because of their impaired physical or mental capacity cannot be readily absorbed in the competitive labor market by an individual receiving such rehabilitation or remunerative work;

As part of an unemployment work-relief or work-training program assisted or financed in whole or in part by a federal agency or an agency of a state or political subdivision thereof, by an individual receiving such work relief or work training;

By an inmate of a custodial or penal institution; or

In the employ of the Commonwealth, or any political subdivision thereof or any instrumentality of any one or more of the foregoing as set forth in subdivisions A 1 through 3, if such service is performed by an individual in the exercise of duties:

As an elected official;

As a member of a legislative body, or a member of the judiciary;

As a member of the state National Guard or Air National Guard;

As an employee serving on a temporary basis in case of fire, storm, snow, earthquake, flood, or similar emergency; or

In a position which, under or pursuant to the laws of the Commonwealth, is designated as (i) a major nontenured policymaking or advisory position or (ii) a policymaking or advisory position the performance of the duties of which ordinarily does not require more than eight hours per week.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-14; 1952, cc. 30, 184; 1956, c. 440; 1962, c. 71; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-14; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1972, c. 824; 1974, cc. 466, 660; 1976, c. 304; 1977, c. 330; 1979, c. 637; 1980, cc. 520, 522; 1981, cc. 28, 369, 374, 375; 1982, c. 25; 1983, c. 14; 1984, cc. 120, 139, 204; 1985, cc. 152, 254; 1986, c. 480; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

Cross references.

As to benefits based on service in employment defined in subsection A of this section, see §

60.2-615

.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “is impaired by age, physical deficiency, mental illness, intellectual disability, or injury” for “is impaired by age or physical or mental deficiency, or injury” in subdivision B 3; and made minor stylistic changes throughout the section.

§ 60.2-214.
Agricultural employment.

“Employment” includes service performed by an individual in agricultural labor as defined in §

60.2-201

when:

Such service is performed for a person who:

During any calendar quarter in either the current or the preceding calendar year paid wages of $20,000 or more to individuals employed in agricultural labor, including labor performed by an alien referred to in subdivision 2 of this subsection, or

For some portion of a day in each of twenty different calendar weeks, whether or not such weeks were consecutive, in either the current or the preceding calendar year, employed in agricultural labor, including labor performed by an alien referred to in subdivision 2 of this subsection, ten or more individuals, regardless of whether they were employed at the same moment of time.

For the purposes of this section any individual who is a member of a crew furnished by a crew leader to perform service in agricultural labor for any other person shall be treated as an employee of such crew leader if:

Such crew leader holds a valid certificate of registration under the Migrant and Seasonal Agricultural Workers Protection Act of 1983 (29 U.S.C. § 1801 et seq.) or substantially all the members of such crew operate or maintain tractors, mechanized harvesting or crop dusting equipment, or any other mechanized equipment, which is provided by such crew leader, and

Such individual is not an employee of such other person within the meaning of subdivision 1 of subsection A of §

60.2-212

.

For the purposes of this section, in the case of any individual who is furnished by a crew leader to perform service in agricultural labor for any other person and who is not treated as an employee of such crew leader under subsection B of this section then:

Such other person and not the crew leader shall be treated as the employer of such individual, and

Such other person shall be treated as having paid wages to such individual in an amount equal to the amount of wages paid to such individual by the crew leader, either on his own behalf or on behalf of such other person, for the service in agricultural labor performed for such other person.

For the purposes of this section, the term “crew leader” means an individual who:

Furnishes individuals to perform service in agricultural labor for any other person,

Pays, either on his own behalf or on behalf of such other person, the individuals so furnished by him for the service in agricultural labor performed by them, and

Has not entered into a written agreement with such other person under which such individual is designated as an employee of such other person.

2.

Such service is not performed in agricultural labor by an individual who is an alien admitted to the United States to perform service in agricultural labor pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 214 (c) and 8 U.S.C. § 101 (a) (15) (H) of the Immigration and Nationality Act. Services performed and wages received by such alien workers after January 1, 1980, shall be counted in determining whether an employer is subject to the Virginia unemployment tax for his other farmworkers.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-14; 1952, cc. 30, 184; 1956, c. 440; 1962, c. 71; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-14; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1972, c. 824; 1974, cc. 466, 660; 1976, c. 304; 1977, c. 330; 1979, c. 637; 1980, cc. 520, 522; 1981, cc. 28, 369, 374, 375; 1982, c. 25; 1983, c. 14; 1984, cc. 120, 139, 204; 1985, cc. 152, 254; 1986, c. 480; 1987, c. 113; 1993, c. 250; 1996, c. 745.

Editor’s note.

Former provisions of 8 U.S.C. § 101 et seq., referred to in subdivision A 2 above, were transferred to 8 U.S.C. § 1552. Former section 214 of Title 8 of the United States Code was repealed.

Acts 1996, c. 745, cl. 2 provides, “[t]hat the provisions of this act shall become effective (i) on the effective date of amendments or changes to § 3306 (c) (1) B of the Federal Unemployment Taxation Act made by the Congress of the United States, or (ii) on the date such provision is finally adjudged invalid or unconstitutional by the Supreme Court of the United States rendering, in either event, the provisions of subdivision A 2 of §

60.2-214

stricken by this act invalid or without further effect. In such event, the Governor shall, within sixty days of the effective date of such amendment or change to § 3306 (c) (1) B of the Federal Unemployment Taxation Act, or from the date that such provision is finally adjudged invalid or unconstitutional, by proclamation so state.”

The contingency necessary for the 1996 amendment to this section to take effect has been satisfied, with the signing by the President of the Small Business Job Protection Act of 1996.

Acts 1996, c. 745, cl. 3 provides: “[t]hat any employer taxes paid pursuant to the provisions of subdivision A 2 of §

60.2-214

after § 3306 (c) (1) B of the Federal Unemployment Taxation Act is amended or otherwise changed by the Congress of the United States, or is finally adjudged invalid or unconstitutional by the Supreme Court of the United States shall be refunded pursuant to §

60.2-524

. Such refunds shall be retroactive to the effective date of such amendment, change or adjudication, which date shall be set forth in the Governor’s proclamation as provided in the second enactment herein.”

§ 60.2-215.
Domestic employment.

“Employment” includes domestic service performed by an individual in a private home, local college club or local chapter of a college fraternity or sorority for a person who paid wages of $1,000 or more to individuals employed in such domestic service in any calendar quarter in the current calendar year or the preceding calendar year. The term “domestic service” shall not include any medical services performed by personnel such as a nurse, nurse’s aide, private nurse, practical nurse, student nurse or attendant rendering medical services in a private residence or a medical institution where such personnel are employed by the person receiving such services.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-14; 1952, cc. 30, 184; 1956, c. 440; 1962, c. 71; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-14; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1972, c. 824; 1974, cc. 466, 660; 1976, c. 304; 1977, c. 330; 1979, c. 637; 1980, cc. 520, 522; 1981, cc. 28, 369, 374, 375; 1982, c. 25; 1983, c. 14; 1984, cc. 120, 139, 204; 1985, cc. 152, 254; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-216.
Employment outside of United States.

“Employment” includes any service of an individual who is a citizen of the United States, performed outside the United States, except in Canada, in the employ of an American employer other than service which is deemed “employment” under the provisions of subsections A and B of §

60.2-217

or the parallel provisions of another state’s law, if:

The employer’s principal place of business in the United States is located in this Commonwealth;

The employer has no place of business in the United States, but

The employer is an individual who is a resident of this Commonwealth,

The employer is a corporation which is organized under the laws of this Commonwealth, or

The employer is a partnership or a trust and the number of the partners or trustees who are residents of this Commonwealth is greater than the number who are residents of any one other state; or

An “American employer,” for purposes of this section, means a person who is:

An individual who is a resident of the United States;

A partnership, if two-thirds or more of the partners are residents of the United States;

A trust, if all of the trustees are residents of the United States; or

A corporation organized under the laws of the United States or of any state.

As used in this section, the term “United States” shall be defined as “state” is defined in §

60.2-225

.

3.

None of the criteria of subdivisions 1 and 2 of this subsection is met but the employer has elected coverage in this Commonwealth or, the employer having failed to elect coverage in any state, the individual has filed a claim for benefits, based on such service, under the law of this Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-14; 1952, cc. 30, 184; 1956, c. 440; 1962, c. 71; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-14; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1972, c. 824; 1974, cc. 466, 660; 1976, c. 304; 1977, c. 330; 1979, c. 637; 1980, cc. 520, 522; 1981, cc. 28, 369, 374, 375; 1982, c. 25; 1983, c. 14; 1984, cc. 120, 139, 204; 1985, cc. 152, 254; 1986, c. 480.

§ 60.2-217.
Employment within and without Commonwealth.

The term “employment” shall include an individual’s entire service, performed within or both within and without this Commonwealth if:

The service is localized in this Commonwealth; or

The service is not localized in any state but some of the service is performed in this Commonwealth and (i) the base of operations, or, if there is no base of operations, then the place from which such service is directed or controlled, is in this Commonwealth; or (ii) the base of operations or place from which such service is directed or controlled is not in any state in which some part of the service is performed, but the individual’s residence is in this Commonwealth.

Services performed within this Commonwealth and not covered under subsection A of this section shall be deemed to be employment subject to this title if taxes are not required and paid with respect to such services under an unemployment compensation law of any other state or of the federal government.

Services not covered under subsection A of this section, and performed entirely without this Commonwealth, with respect to no part of which taxes are required and paid under an unemployment compensation law of any other state or of the federal government, shall be deemed to be employment subject to this title if (i) the individual performing such services is a resident of this Commonwealth and (ii) the Commission approves the election of the employing unit, for whom such services are performed, that the entire service of such individual shall be deemed to be employment subject to this title.
C. 1. Services not covered under subsection A of this section, and performed entirely without this Commonwealth, with respect to no part of which taxes are required and paid under an unemployment compensation law of any other state or of the federal government, shall be deemed to be employment subject to this title if (i) the individual performing such services is a resident of this Commonwealth and (ii) the Commission approves the election of the employing unit, for whom such services are performed, that the entire service of such individual shall be deemed to be employment subject to this title.

Services covered by an arrangement between the Commission and the agency charged with the administration of any other state or federal unemployment compensation law, pursuant to which all services performed by an individual for an employing unit are deemed to be performed entirely within this Commonwealth, shall be deemed to be employment if the Commission has approved an election of the employing unit for whom such services are performed, pursuant to which the entire service of such individual during the period covered by such election is deemed to be insured work.

The Commission is hereby authorized to enter into reciprocal arrangements with appropriate and duly authorized agencies of other states or the federal government whereby services performed by an individual for a single employing unit for which services are customarily performed in more than one state shall be deemed to be services performed entirely within any one of the states (i) in which any part of such individual’s service is performed, (ii) in which such individual has his residence, or (iii) in which the employing unit maintains a place of business. Any such arrangement shall be authorized if there is in effect, as to such services, an election, approved by the agency charged with the administration of such state’s unemployment compensation law, pursuant to which all the services performed by such individual for such employing unit are deemed to be performed entirely within such state.

To the extent permissible under the laws and Constitution of this Commonwealth and the United States, the Commission is authorized to enter into or cooperate in arrangements whereby facilities and services provided under this title and facilities and services provided under the unemployment compensation law of any foreign government established on the continent of North America, may be utilized for the taking of claims and the payment of benefits under this title or under a similar law of such foreign government.

Service shall be deemed to be localized within a state if:
D. 1. Service shall be deemed to be localized within a state if:

The service is performed entirely within such state; or

The service is performed both within and without such state, but the service performed without such state is incidental to the individual’s service within the state, for example is temporary or transitory in nature or consists of isolated transactions.

2.

Services performed outside the state in which the base of operations is located shall be deemed to be incidental to the services performed within such state.

History.

Code 1950, § 60-14; 1952, cc. 30, 184; 1956, c. 440; 1962, c. 71; 1968, c. 738, § 60.1-14; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 235; 1972, c. 824; 1974, cc. 466, 660; 1976, c. 304; 1977, c. 330; 1979, c. 637; 1980, cc. 520, 522; 1981, cc. 28, 369, 374, 375; 1982, c. 25; 1983, c. 14; 1984, cc. 120, 139, 204; 1985, cc. 152, 254; 1986, c. 480.